Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7225.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 167.3
EMERGENCY SHELTERS
42-167.3-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the term:
(1) "Emergency shelter" means a facility with overnight sleeping accommodations, the
primary purpose of which is to provide temporary shelter for the homeless in general or for specific
populations of the homeless.
(2) "Executive office of housing" or "office" means the executive office of housing
established pursuant to the provisions of § 42-167-1.
(3) “Secretary” means the secretary of housing appointed pursuant to § 42-167-4.
42-167.3-2. Licensing and exemption.
(a) The executive office of housing shall establish an application for an emergency shelter
license no later than January 1, 2027. Upon receipt of an application for a license, the licensing
agency shall issue a license if the applicant meets the requirements established pursuant to this
chapter. A license issued under the provisions of this section shall be the property of the state and
loaned to the licensee, and it shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises. Each
license shall be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application, and shall not be

transferable or assignable except with the written approval of the secretary. No fee shall be charged
for the license.
(b) Any emergency shelter established due to a natural disaster, impending dangerous
storm, or other event, including, but not limited to, fires, hurricanes or blizzards, shall be exempt
from this chapter.
42-167.3-3. Minimum shelter standards.
(a) All emergency shelters that are required to be licensed shall:
(1) Provide a safe place for a person to temporarily reside. Safety of residents and staff
shall be the shelters’ top priority;
(2) Make drinking water available to residents and proper bathroom facilities as required
by the state building code in chapter 27.3 of title 23;
(3) Develop a written policy regarding the privacy and confidentiality of its residents as
required by state and federal law; and
(4) Establish an office approved procedure for the safe transfer of a person seeking shelter
or having been sheltered at the licensed premises, who can no longer reside in the shelter at the
licensed premises in question. The established procedure shall be posted in a conspicuous place on
the licensed premises that is in an area accessed frequently by residents.
(b) The executive office of housing shall promulgate additional minimum shelter standards
that shall apply to emergency shelters that are at least partially funded by the state, no later than
December 1, 2027.
42-167.3-4. Grievance procedure.
The office shall promulgate a grievance procedure designed to address complaints of
persons who have resided or attempted to reside in any emergency shelter within this state.
Grievance procedures shall be posted in the licensed premises in a conspicuous place accessed
frequently by residents.
42-167.3-5. Fees prohibited.
Any fees or payments of money for the purposes of providing shelter and personal care
items including, but not limited to, linens, toiletries and diapers shall be prohibited unless otherwise
allowable by state or federal law. Resident funds provided to a shelter for the purposes of teaching
financial literacy or creating a "savings account" are permitted if the funds are returned to the
resident at the appropriate time or upon request.
LC003771 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003771
========
LC003771 - Page 3 of 4